Hawaii, session 2026, SB2877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The department of education shall establish a two-year student-authored book publication pilot program in which students research, write, and publish original works.  The pilot program shall begin in the 2026-2027 school year and be completed no later than the conclusion of the 2027‑2028 school year.  The pilot program shall be designed to strengthen literacy, analytical thinking, and communication skills; increase student engagement and confidence; support students' academic progression and preparation for postsecondary education; and foster connections to culture and community. (b) The student-authored book publication pilot program may be conducted at up to five Kalihi public elementary schools and up to five Nanakuli-Waianae public elementary schools on an opt-in basis and made available to students in grades four, five, and six; provided that the pilot program shall be integrated into the existing grade level curricula of participating schools as a capstone. (c) Under the student-authored book publication pilot program: (1)  Each teacher for grades four through six at participating schools may select a topic for their class relating to Hawaiian culture, the local community, or a personal story; and (2)  Using a classroom student book publishing program, each student shall write and illustrate a standard size online book on the selected topic; provided that the dimensions and length of the book shall be determined by the teacher according to available funds. (d)  Each teacher at participating schools shall receive a budget to implement the student-authored book publication pilot program in their classroom. (e) The principal of each participating school shall submit a report on the student-authored book publication pilot program to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2029.  The report shall include: (1)  Assessments of the pilot program's implementation, student outcomes, and the feasibility of continuing or expanding the pilot program; and (2)  Additional findings and recommendations. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $50,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the student-authored book publication pilot program, to be distributed to participating schools based on the number of students and cost of books. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act; provided that the sum appropriated shall only be expended if private sources supply matching funds of not less than twenty-five per cent of the appropriated sum; provided further that any unencumbered funds shall lapse to the credit of the general fund on June 30, 2028. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.